Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 6 Division of Forensic Sciences

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Forensic Sciences Act of 1997’.”

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 11 was codified by the General Assembly in 1998.
For the codification of subsection (a) of Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 11, see subsection (h) of Code Section 45-16-22.
For the codification of subsection (b) of Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 11, see Code Section 45-16-49.

35-3-150.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Public Safety.

“Crime lab” or “state crime lab” means the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

“Director” means the director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

“Division” means the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

“Division director” means the director of the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

“Independent test” means a forensic analysis of evidence in the custody and possession of the state or any political subdivision or authority thereof conducted at the request of or on behalf of any person other than a prosecuting attorney, law enforcement officer, or other authorized agent of the state or which are ordered conducted by a court at the request of an accused.

“Regional medical examiner” shall have the same meaning as defined in paragraph (13) of Code Section 45-16-21.

“Rule” or “rules” means a rule or regulation adopted pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-150

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 3.

35-3-151.
Responsibilities.

The Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation:

Shall provide a state-wide system of laboratories dedicated to conducting forensic analysis of evidence submitted to the laboratory by law enforcement agencies, prosecuting attorneys, coroners, and medical examiners;

Shall provide forensic services to the criminal justice system for the examination and analysis of evidence in the areas of medical examiner inquiries, latent fingerprints, photography, questioned documents, firearms and weapons, trace evidence, implied consent, blood alcohol, toxicology, chemistry, drugs, serology, DNA, and such other areas as the director may authorize or the board shall direct;

Shall establish standards for the identification, collection, transportation, and analysis of forensic evidence;

Shall facilitate independent testing or analysis of evidence within the possession, custody, or control of the division as provided in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 17-16-4, relating to discovery in criminal cases;

Shall provide for and establish uniform fees as approved by the board to be paid to medical examiners, dentists, and other professionals for participating in medical examiners’ inquiries or coroners’ inquests pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 16 of Title 45, known as the “Georgia Death Investigation Act”;

May assist in the training of law enforcement officers, prosecuting attorneys, coroners, and medical examiners as it relates to forensic sciences in cooperation with the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia, and the Georgia Coroner’s Training Council, as appropriate; and

May assist in the training of judges and attorneys as it relates to forensic sciences in cooperation with the Institute of Continuing Judicial Education of Georgia and the Institute of Continuing Legal Education, as appropriate.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-151

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 3.

35-3-152.
Appointment, powers, and responsibilities of division director.

Responsibility for the development, maintenance, and operations of the division shall be vested in the division director.

The division director shall be appointed by the director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

The division director may, with the approval of the board, establish such advisory panels as may be necessary to assist the director to maintain and improve quality control and customer satisfaction.

The division director shall appoint and maintain the necessary professional and support staff to enable the division to carry out its duties and responsibilities effectively and efficiently.

The division director may designate one or more members of the division staff as the official custodians of the records of the division.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-152

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 3.

35-3-153.
Chief medical examiner office created; appointment; responsibilities.

Within the division there shall be an office of chief medical examiner.

The chief medical examiner shall be appointed by the director. No person may be the chief medical examiner unless that person at the time of appointment is a pathologist certified in forensic pathology by the American Board of Pathology.

It shall be the duty of the chief medical examiner to:

Establish death investigation regions throughout the state and establish policies concerning the requirements for appointment of regional medical examiners to oversee death investigation activities in each established region;

Appoint regional medical examiners;

Employ forensic consultants and other independent contractors with the approval of the division director;

Organize and conduct regular educational sessions as may be needed for medical examiners and coroners in the state in cooperation with the Georgia Coroner’s Training Council and the Georgia Police Academy;

Maintain permanent death investigation records for all jurisdictions in the state;

Establish death investigation guidelines for coroners and medical examiners; and

Cooperate with other state agencies, as appropriate, to ensure public health and safety.

If there is a vacancy in the office of chief medical examiner or the chief medical examiner is disqualified or otherwise unable to perform the duties of said office, the division director shall be authorized to perform the duties of chief medical examiner.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-153

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 3.

35-3-154.
Division requirements.

The division shall:

Establish written standards and procedures for the administration of forensic testing. The division shall retain a copy of any procedure adopted pursuant to this paragraph which is modified for a period of five years from the date of its being superseded by the modification;

Adopt rules and regulations as required by law; and

In cooperation with the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, provide for the training and certification of operators of such breath test equipment. A copy of such operator’s certificate shall be prima-facie evidence in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding that such operator was qualified to operate such equipment.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-154

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 3.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Implied consent, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Bureau of Investigation, Chapter 92-3.

35-3-154.1.
Admission of reports from state crime laboratory.

A copy of a report of the methods and findings of any examination or analysis conducted by an employee of the state crime laboratory or an employee of a laboratory with which the state crime laboratory has a contract for the provision of laboratory or scientific examination or analysis, authenticated under oath, is prima-facie evidence in court proceedings in this state of the facts contained therein.

The report shall have the effect as if the person who performed the analysis or examination had personally testified and shall have an affidavit of the employee stating:

That he or she is certified to perform the requisite analysis or examination;

His or her experience as a chemist or analyst and as an expert witness testifying in court; and

That he or she conducted the tests shown on the report using procedures approved by the bureau and the report accurately reflects his or her opinion regarding the results.

The prosecuting attorney shall serve a copy on the defendant’s attorney of record, or on the defendant if pro se, prior to the first proceeding in which the report is to be used against the defendant.

Any report under this Code section shall contain notice of the right to demand the testimony of the person signing the report.

The defendant may object in writing any time after service of the report, but at least ten days prior to trial, to the introduction of the report. If objection is made, the judge shall require the employee to be present to testify. The state shall diligently investigate the witness’s availability and report to the court. If the witness is not available on a timely basis, the court shall grant a continuance.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-154.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 626, § 2.A; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 35/HB 95; Ga. L. 2005, p. 503, § 1/HB 347.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “state” was substituted for “State” in subsection (a); “stating:” was substituted for “stating that” at the end of the introductory paragraph in subsection (b); “That he” was substituted for “He” at the beginning of paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(3); and “in which” was inserted in subsection (c).

35-3-155.
Application of Administrative Procedure Act.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by law, technical, scientific, and similar processes, procedures, guidelines, standards, and methods for the collection, preservation, or testing of evidence adopted by the division shall not be subject to the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-155

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 3.